Utah statutes.
31A-35-406.   Renewal and reinstatement.

(1) (a)  To renew its license under this chapter, on or before the last day of the month in which the license expires a bail bond surety company shall:

(i)  complete and submit a renewal application to the department; and

(ii)  pay the department the applicable renewal fee established in accordance with Section 31A-3-103.

(b)  A bail bond surety company shall renew its license under this chapter annually as established by department rule, regardless of when the license is issued.

(2)  A bail bond surety company may apply for reinstatement of an expired bail bond surety company license within one year following the expiration of the license under Subsection (1) by:

(a)  submitting the renewal application required by Subsection (1); and

(b)  paying a license reinstatement fee established in accordance with Section 31A-3-103.

(3)  If a bail bond surety company license has been expired for more than one year, the person applying for reinstatement of the bail bond surety license shall:

(a)  submit a new application form to the commissioner; and

(b)  pay the application fee established in accordance with Section 31A-3-103.

(4)  If a bail bond surety company license is suspended, the applicant may not submit an application for a bail bond surety company license until after the end of the period of suspension.

(5) A fee collected under this section shall be deposited in the restricted account created in Section 31A-35-407.

